Utah statutes.
17-33-1.   Title -- Establishment of merit system -- Separate systems for
peace officers and firemen recognized -- Options of small counties.
(1) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "County Personnel
Management Act."
(2)  A merit system of personnel administration for the counties of the state
of Utah, their departments, offices, and agencies, except as otherwise
specifically provided, is established.
(3)  This chapter recognizes the existence of the merit systems for peace
officers of the several counties as provided for in Chapter 30, Deputy
Sheriffs - Merit System, and for firemen of the several counties as provided
for in Chapter 28, Firemen's Civil Service Commission, and is intended to give
county commissions the option of using the provisions of this chapter as a
single merit system for all county employees or in combination with these
existing systems for firemen and peace officers.
(4)  On or after May 6, 2002, any county that has fewer than 200 employees not
covered by other merit systems or not exempt under Subsections
17-33-8(1)(b)(i) through (vii) may, at its option, comply with the provisions
of this chapter.
(5)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (4), any county which was in
compliance with the provisions of this chapter prior to May 6, 2002, shall
continue to comply with the provisions of this chapter even though the county
may not thereafter meet or exceed the threshold requirements of Subsection
(4).
